Illinois, session 104th, HB3670.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Pharmacy Accountability and Access Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. As used in this Act: 7    "Department" means the Department of Public Health. 8    "Pharmacy" means every store, shop, pharmacy department, 9or other place where pharmacist care is provided by a 10pharmacist and (1) where drugs, medicines, or poisons are 11dispensed, sold, or offered for sale at retail or displayed 12for sale at retail; (2) where prescriptions of physicians, 13dentists, advanced practice registered nurses, physician 14assistants, veterinarians, podiatric physicians, or 15optometrists, within the limits of their licenses, are 16compounded, filled, or dispensed; (3) which has upon it or 17displayed within it, or affixed to or used in connection with 18it, a sign bearing the word or words "Pharmacist", "Druggist", 19"Pharmacy", "Pharmaceutical Care", "Apothecary", "Drugstore", 20"Medicine Store", "Prescriptions", "Drugs", "Dispensary", 21"Medicines", or any word or words of similar or like import, 22either in the English language or any other language; (4) 23where the characteristic prescription sign (Rx) or similar   HB3670- 2 -LRB104 10855 BAB 20937 b1design is exhibited; or (5) any store, shop, or other place 2with respect to which any of the described words, objects, 3signs, or designs are used in any advertisement. 4    Section 10. Applicability. This Act applies only to 5companies operating pharmacies in the State of Illinois that: 6        (1) operate more than 10 locations statewide; or 7        (2) have annual gross revenues of $50,000,000 or more. 8    Section 15. Advance notice requirements. 9    (a) Any owner of a pharmacy licensed under the Pharmacy 10Practice Act must provide written notice no later than 180 11calendar days before any pharmacy may be closed. 12    (b) The notice required by this Section must be sent to the 13Department of Financial and Professional Regulation, the 14Department of Public Health, the government of the 15municipality in which the pharmacy is located, the government 16of the county in which the pharmacy is located, and any local 17community leaders requesting to receive the notice. 18    (c) The notice required by this Section must be physically 19posted at the affected location and prominently posted on the 20company's website for the entire 180-day period. 21    Section 20. Reporting of closures. Any corporation owning 22or operating pharmacies in the State must, prior to closing 23any pharmacy, submit to the Department of Financial and   HB3670- 3 -LRB104 10855 BAB 20937 b1Professional Regulation and the Department of Public Health a 2report detailing the justification for closure, including any 3documentation of financial losses, operational inefficiencies, 4or how closure would otherwise align with the social 5responsibility commitments of the corporation. 6    Section 25. Public meetings. 7    (a) Any owner of a pharmacy licensed under the Pharmacy 8Practice Act seeking to close a pharmacy must, during the 9180-day notice period required by Section 10 of this Act, hold 10at least 2 public meetings in the community at the location 11that is closing. 12    (b) The public meetings required by this Section must: 13        (1) be held in person at an accessible community 14    venue; 15        (2) be scheduled during the evening or on the weekend, 16    to accommodate maximum attendance; and 17        (3) include a virtual participation option for those 18    unable to attend in person. 19    (c) At the public meeting, the company owning or operating 20the location to be closed must present the following 21information: 22        (1) the reasons for closure, including relevant 23    financial or operational data; 24        (2) a community transition plan, outlining any needed 25    mitigation measures; and   HB3670- 4 -LRB104 10855 BAB 20937 b1        (3) options for how residents will be able to access 2    prescriptions and other health care services post-closure. 3    (d) Public meetings required by this Section must include 4time for community feedback and a question-and-answer session. 5    (e) Public meetings required by this Section must be 6attended by representatives of the Department of Public Health 7or local government officials, who will be responsible for 8moderating discussions and ensuring community concerns are 9heard and addressed. 10    (f) After any public meeting required by this Section, the 11company owning or operating the pharmacy location to be closed 12must submit a summary of community feedback and proposed 13adjustments to the transition plan to the Department of 14Financial and Professional Regulation and the Department of 15Public Health. 16    Section 30. Community transition plan. 17    (a) Before any pharmacy may be closed, the company owning 18or operating the pharmacy must submit a community transition 19plan to the Department of Public Health, including, at 20minimum, the following information: 21        (1) options for nearby pharmacies, transportation 22    support, or partnerships with local health care providers 23    that will ensure local residents continue to have access 24    to medications and other health care services; and 25        (2) options for repurposing the physical space of the   HB3670- 5 -LRB104 10855 BAB 20937 b1    location to be closed for health care-related uses, such 2    as telehealth kiosks or prescription lockers. 3    (b) The Department shall review all community transition 4plans submitted pursuant to this Section, and send back to the 5submitting entity a report detailing the effects on health 6care access and outcomes for the community with regard to the 7closure, and any economic impacts of the closure. This report 8shall also include proposed mitigation strategies to address 9problems, including collaboration with local governments or 10nonprofits to fill service gaps. 11    (c) Department responses pursuant to subsection (b) shall 12also be posted to a publicly accessible part of the 13Department's website. 14    Section 35. Repayment of tax incentives. Any company that 15receives tax incentives, subsidies, or other financial 16benefits from public funds to operate a pharmacy in the 17community shall, if the requirements of this Act are not met, 18pay to the public entity from which the benefits were received 19an amount equal to the total benefits received.  20    Section 40. Medically underserved communities. The 21Department must review the closure and confirm that suitable 22alternative options for access to medication and other health 23care services are available when any proposed pharmacy closure 24pursuant to this Act is located within a medically underserved   HB3670- 6 -LRB104 10855 BAB 20937 b1community. As used in this Section, "medically underserved 2community" means a community where greater than 50% of 3households do not exceed 80% of the State median income for the 4current State fiscal year. 5    Section 45. Penalties. Any entity operating a pharmacy 6subject to this Act that fails to comply with any of the 7requirements of this Act shall be ineligible for State or 8local tax incentives for a period of 5 years following the date 9the violation occurred and shall pay community restitution to 10fund health care access initiatives in any area affected by 11the violation or violations. These payments shall be in an 12amount equal to the assessed property value of the property 13where the closing pharmacy was located.